District of Columbia statutes.
38-808

Distribution of commodities.

The State Education Office of the District of Columbia is authorized: (1) to enter into a contract or contracts from time to time with the United States Department of Agriculture for the distribution to schools and to public and charitable institutions of commodities made available by said Department; and (2) to carry out, under regulations of the said Board, a program or programs of furnishing milk to school children in the District, including the purchase and distribution of milk under agreement with the United States Department of Agriculture; provided, that all moneys collected under such program or programs shall be paid to the Director of the Department of Finance and Revenue of the District of Columbia for deposit into the Treasury of the United States to the credit of the District.

Oct. 8, 1951, 65 Stat. 370, ch. 448, title II, § 201
Oct. 21, 2000, D.C. Law 13-176, § 8(b), 47 DCR 6835
This section is referenced in § 38-809.
1981 Ed., § 31-808.
1973 Ed., § 31-1409.
D.C. Law 13-176 authorized substitution of State Education Office for Board of Education where appearing in this section.
Pursuant to the Office of the Chief Financial Officer’s “Notice of Public Interest” published in the April 18, 1997, issue of the District of Columbia Register ( 44 DCR 2345) the Office of Tax and Revenue assumed all of the duties and functions previously performed by the Department of Finance and Revenue, as set forth in Commissioner’s Order 69-96, dated March 7, 1969. This action was made effective January 22, 1997, nunc pro tunc.
Office of Collector of Taxes abolished: The Office of the Collector of Taxes was abolished and the functions thereof transferred to the Board of Commissioners of the District of Columbia by Reorganization Plan No. 5 of 1952. All functions of the Office of the Collector of Taxes including the functions of all officers, employees, and subordinate agencies were transferred to the Director, Department of General Administration by Reorganization Order No. 3, dated August 28, 1952. Reorganization Order No. 20, dated November 10, 1952, transferred the functions of the Collector of Taxes to the Finance Office. The same Order provided for the Office of the Collector of Taxes headed by a Collector in the Finance Office, and abolished the previously existing Office of the Collector of Taxes. Reorganization Order No. 20 was superseded and replaced by Organization Order No. 121, dated December 12, 1957, which provided that the Finance Office consisting of the Office of the Finance Officer, Property Tax Division, Revenue Division, Treasury Division, Accounting Division, and Data Processing Division would continue under the direction and control of the Director of General Administration, and that the Treasury Division would perform the function of collecting revenues of the District of Columbia and depositing the same with the Treasurer of the United States. Organization Order No. 121 was revoked by Organization Order No. 3, dated December 13, 1967, Part IVC of which prescribed the functions of the Finance Office within a newly established Department of General Administration. The executive functions of the Board of Commissioners were transferred to the Commissioner of the District of Columbia by § 401 of Reorganization Plan No. 3 of 1967. Functions of the Finance Office as stated in Part IVC of Organization Order No. 3 were transferred to the Director of the Department of Finance and Revenue by Commissioner’s Order No. 69-96, dated March 7, 1969.